Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1245.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of transportation; Rodeo Road; pavement replacement; trail connector project The sum of $2,457,100 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of transportation to distribute to the city of Williams for the Rodeo Road pavement replacement and trail connector project.